Maine, session 132, LD535.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §3315, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 326, §12, is
amended to read:
A. A juvenile who has not attained 21 years of age must be represented by counsel at
this review.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §3316, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Determinate disposition extending beyond 21st birthday. Notwithstanding
subsection 2, the court may commit a juvenile to a Department of Corrections juvenile
correctional facility pursuant to section 3314, subsection 1, paragraph F for a period that
may extend beyond the juvenile's 21st birthday as long as the period does not extend
beyond the maximum allowed sentence of imprisonment for an adult convicted of similar
conduct if the conduct subject to the adjudication is conduct that, if committed by an adult,
would be defined as murder or a Class A crime by the Maine Criminal Code, or by any
other criminal statute outside that code. In deciding whether to commit a juvenile for a
period beyond the juvenile's 21st birthday, the court shall consider the following factors:
A. The severity and circumstances of the offense, including any aggravating factors,
use of weapons, degree of harm caused and vulnerability of the victim;
B. The juvenile's age at the time of the offense and evidence of maturity, impulse
control and mental development;
C. Evidence of the juvenile's capacity for reform, including past behavior, educational
achievements, participation in counseling or other rehabilitative programs and
willingness to change;
D. The juvenile's past criminal record, if any, and the pattern or escalation of criminal
behavior;
E. Statements or evidence regarding the harm or trauma experienced by the victims
and the community's interest in justice and safety; and
F. Findings from psychological assessments, particularly those evaluating the
juvenile's risk of reoffending and the potential for rehabilitation.
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §3317, as amended by PL 2021, c. 326, §14, is further amended
to read:
§3317. Disposition after return to Juvenile Court
In instances of commitment of a juvenile to the Department of Health and Human
Services or a Department of Corrections juvenile correctional facility or when the juvenile
is under a specified period of probation, the Commissioner of Health and Human Services
or the commissioner's designee or the Commissioner of Corrections or the commissioner's
designee, or the juvenile following the disposition may for good cause petition the Juvenile
Court having original jurisdiction in the case for a judicial review of the disposition,
including extension of the period of commitment or period of probation. For a petition
initiated by the juvenile, the Department of Health and Human Services or the Department
of Corrections shall provide information including, but not limited to, the information in
reports required for periodic review pursuant to section 3315. In all cases in which the
juvenile is returned to a Juvenile Court, the Juvenile Court may make any of the
Page 1 - 132LR0378(01)

413 dispositions otherwise provided in section 3314; section 3316, subsection 2-A; and Title
424 34‑A, section 3805, subsection 2. When reviewing a commitment to the Department of
435 Health and Human Services, the court shall consider efforts made by the Department of
446 Corrections and the Department of Health and Human Services to reunify the juvenile with
457 the juvenile's parents or custodians, shall make a finding regarding those efforts and shall
468 return custody of the juvenile to a parent or legal custodian if the return of the juvenile is
479 not contrary to the welfare of the juvenile. A petition for judicial review of a disposition
580 committing the juvenile to the Department of Health and Human Services must be served
591 on the parents at least 7 days prior to the hearing. Absent extraordinary circumstances, the
1502 juvenile may file a petition no more than once every 180 days. A juvenile who has not
1513 attained 21 years of age must be represented by counsel at this review.
Sec. 4. 15 MRSA §3319, as amended by PL 2005, c. 507, §13, is further amended
to read:
§3319. Designation of facility
Immediately after the court orders detention or confinement in or commitment to a
juvenile facility, the court shall notify the Commissioner of Corrections or the
commissioner's designee and shall inquire as to the juvenile facility to which the juvenile
will be transported. The commissioner has complete discretion to make this determination.
The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall immediately inform the court of
the location of the juvenile facility to which the juvenile will be transported. If the juvenile
has been committed to a Department of Corrections juvenile correctional facility beyond
the juvenile's 21st birthday under section 3316, subsection 2-A, the commissioner shall
direct the transfer of the juvenile to an adult correctional facility.